Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 3. Discipline.
§ 22.1-279.3:1.
Reports of certain acts to school authorities; reports of certain acts by school authorities to parents; reports of certain acts by school authorities to law enforcement.

Reports shall be made to the division superintendent and to the principal or his designee on all incidents involving:

Alcohol, marijuana, a controlled substance, an imitation controlled substance, or an anabolic steroid on a school bus, on school property, or at a school-sponsored activity, including the theft or attempted theft of student prescription medications;

The assault and battery that results in bodily injury of any person on a school bus, on school property, or at a school-sponsored activity;

The sexual assault, death, shooting, stabbing, cutting, or wounding of any person, abduction of any person as described in §

18.2-47

or

18.2-48

, or stalking of any person as described in §

18.2-60.3

, on a school bus, on school property, or at a school-sponsored activity;

Any written threats against school personnel while on a school bus, on school property, or at a school-sponsored activity;

The illegal carrying of a firearm, as defined in § 22.1-277.07, onto school property;

Any illegal conduct involving firebombs, explosive materials or devices, or hoax explosive devices, as defined in §

18.2-85

, or explosive or incendiary devices, as defined in §

18.2-433.1

, or chemical bombs, as described in §

18.2-87.1

, on a school bus, on school property, or at a school-sponsored activity;

Any threats or false threats to bomb, as described in §

18.2-83

, made against school personnel or involving school property or school buses; or

The arrest of any student for an incident occurring on a school bus, on school property, or at a school-sponsored activity, including the charge therefor.

Except as may otherwise be required by federal law, regulation, or jurisprudence, each principal:

Shall immediately report to the local law-enforcement agency any incident described in subdivision A 1 that may constitute a felony offense;

Shall immediately report to the local law-enforcement agency any incident described in subdivisions A 3 through 7, except that a principal is not required to but may report to the local law-enforcement agency any incident described in subdivision A 4 committed by a student who has a disability;

May report to the local law-enforcement agency any other incident described in subsection A that is not required to be reported pursuant to subdivision 1 or 2; and

Shall immediately report any act enumerated in subdivisions A 1 through 5 that may constitute a criminal offense to the parents of any minor student who is the specific object of such act. Further, the principal shall report whether the incident has been reported to local law enforcement pursuant to this subsection and, if the incident has been so reported, that the parents may contact local law enforcement for further information, if they so desire.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 12 (§ 16.1-299 et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 16.1, local law-enforcement authorities shall report, and the principal or his designee and the division superintendent shall receive such reports, on offenses, wherever committed, by students enrolled at the school if the offense would be a felony if committed by an adult or would be a violation of the Drug Control Act (§

54.1-3400

et seq.) and occurred on a school bus, on school property, or at a school-sponsored activity, or would be an adult misdemeanor involving any incidents described in subsection A, and whether the student is released to the custody of his parent or, if 18 years of age or more, is released on bond. As part of any report concerning an offense that would be an adult misdemeanor involving an incident described in subsection A, local law-enforcement authorities and attorneys for the Commonwealth shall be authorized to disclose information regarding terms of release from detention, court dates, and terms of any disposition orders entered by the court, to the superintendent of such student’s school division, upon request by the superintendent, if, in the determination of the law-enforcement authority or attorney for the Commonwealth, such disclosure would not jeopardize the investigation or prosecution of the case. No disclosures shall be made pursuant to this section in violation of the confidentiality provisions of subsection A of § 16.1-300 or the record retention and redisclosure provisions of § 22.1-288.2. Further, any school superintendent who receives notification that a juvenile has committed an act that would be a crime if committed by an adult pursuant to subsection G of § 16.1-260 shall report such information to the principal of the school in which the juvenile is enrolled.

The principal or his designee shall submit a report of all incidents required to be reported pursuant to this section to the superintendent of the school division. The division superintendent shall annually report all such incidents to the Department of Education for the purpose of recording the frequency of such incidents on forms that shall be provided by the Department and shall make such information available to the public.

In submitting reports of such incidents, principals and division superintendents shall accurately indicate any offenses, arrests, or charges as recorded by law-enforcement authorities and required to be reported by such authorities pursuant to subsection C.

A division superintendent who knowingly fails to comply or secure compliance with the reporting requirements of this subsection shall be subject to the sanctions authorized in § 22.1-65. A principal who knowingly fails to comply or secure compliance with the reporting requirements of this section shall be subject to sanctions prescribed by the local school board, which may include, but need not be limited to, demotion or dismissal.

The principal or his designee shall also notify the parent of any student involved in an incident required pursuant to this section to be reported, regardless of whether disciplinary action is taken against such student or the nature of the disciplinary action. Such notice shall relate to only the relevant student’s involvement and shall not include information concerning other students.

Whenever any student commits any reportable incident as set forth in this section, such student shall be required to participate in such prevention and intervention activities as deemed appropriate by the superintendent or his designee. Prevention and intervention activities shall be identified in the local school division’s drug and violence prevention plans developed pursuant to the federal Improving America’s Schools Act of 1994 (Title IV — Safe and Drug-Free Schools and Communities Act).

A statement providing a procedure and the purpose for the requirements of this section shall be included in school board policies required by § 22.1-253.13:7.

The Board of Education shall promulgate regulations to implement this section, including, but not limited to, establishing reporting dates and report formats.

For the purposes of this section, “parent” or “parents” means any parent, guardian or other person having control or charge of a child.

This section shall not be construed to diminish the authority of the Board of Education or to diminish the Governor’s authority to coordinate and provide policy direction on official communications between the Commonwealth and the United States government.

Nothing in this section shall require delinquency charges to be filed or prevent schools from dealing with school-based offenses through graduated sanctions or educational programming before a delinquency charge is filed with the juvenile court.

History.

1981, c. 189; 1990, cc. 517, 797; 1991, c. 295; 1994, cc. 265, 285; 1995, cc. 759, 773; 1996, cc. 916, 964; 1999, c. 970; 2000, cc. 79, 611, § 22.1-280.1; 2001, cc. 688, 820; 2002, c. 388; 2003, cc. 899, 954; 2004, cc. 517, 542, 939, 955; 2005, cc. 461, 484, 528; 2006, c. 146; 2010, c. 525; 2011, cc. 384, 410; 2013, c. 800; 2014, cc. 674, 719; 2018, c. 281; 2020, cc. 173, 335; 2022, cc. 793, 794.

Cross references.

As to civil immunity granted school personnel who report or investigate conduct described in this section, see §

8.01-47

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, cc. 939 and 955, cl. 2 provides: “That no educational standard set forth in this act, for which state funding is required, shall take effect unless the state’s share of funding that standard is included in the 2004 Appropriation Act, passed during the 2004 Session of the General Assembly and signed by the Governor.” See Editor’s note under § 22.1-253.13:2 and Acts 2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 4, Items 146 B 6 b and 146 C 2 j.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 388 inserted “including the theft or attempted theft of student prescription medications” at the end of clause (ii) of subsection A.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 899, in subsection D, added “Except as may otherwise be required by federal law, regulation, or jurisprudence”, and in subsection G, substituted “or the Governor concerning decisions on whether, or the extent to which, Virginia shall participate in the federal Improving America’s Schools Act of 1994.”

The 2003 amendment by c. 954, in subsection A, substituted “assault and battery, without bodily injury” for “assault and battery, sexual assault, death, shooting, stabbing, cutting, or wounding” in clause (i), inserted present clause (ii), and redesignated former clauses (ii) through (vi) as clauses (iii) through (vii); and in subsection D, inserted “clauses (ii) through (vii) of” and “and may report to the local law-enforcement agency any incident described in clause (i) of subsection A.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 517 inserted clause (viii) in subsection A; in subsection B, substituted “shall report” for “may report,” “designee and the division superintendent shall receive” for “designee may receive” and “clauses (i) through (viii)” for “clauses (i) through (v)”; deleted “or authorized” following “all incidents required” in the first sentence of subsection C, and substituted “required pursuant to this section” for “required by subsection A or authorized by subsection B” in the first paragraph after subsection C.

The 2004 amendment by c. 542 inserted “as defined in § 22.1-277.07” in clause (v) of subsection A.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 939 and 955 are identical, and substituted “school board policies required by § 22.1-253.13:7” for “the policy manual of all school divisions” at the end in subsection E.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 461 and 484 are identical, and in clause (ii) of subsection A,
substituted “battery that” for “battery which” and inserted “or stalking of any person as described in §

18.2-60.3

”; and added the last paragraph in subsection D.

The 2005 amendment by c. 528 added the second paragraph in subsection C.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 146, in subsection B, added the language beginning “and whether the student is released” at the end of the first sentence and added the last sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 525 inserted the second and third sentences in subsection B.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 384 and 410, effective March 23, 2011, are identical, and inserted “synthetic cannabinoids as defined in §

18.2-248.1:1

” in clause (iii) in subsection A.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 800 added the last sentence in the first paragraph in subsection D.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 674 and 719 are identical, and deleted “synthetic cannabinoids as defined in §

18.2-248.1:1

” following “marijuana” in subsection A.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 281 inserted “abduction of any person as described in §

18.2-47

or

18.2-48

” in clause (ii) of subsection A.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 173 and 335 are identical, and in subsection D, substituted “felony” for “criminal” and deleted “clause (i) of” following “described in” in the first paragraph in the first sentence; substituted “whether the incident has been reported to local law enforcement pursuant to this subsection and, if the incident is so reported” for “that the incident has been reported to local law enforcement as required by law and” in the second paragraph; and made a stylistic change.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 793 and 794 are identical, and rewrote subsection A, which read: “Reports shall be made to the division superintendent and to the principal or his designee on all incidents involving (i) the assault or assault and battery, without bodily injury, of any person on a school bus, on school property, or at a school-sponsored activity; (ii) the assault and battery that results in bodily injury, sexual assault, death, shooting, stabbing, cutting, or wounding of any person, abduction of any person as described in §

18.2-47

or

18.2-48

, or stalking of any person as described in §

18.2-60.3

, on a school bus, on school property, or at a school-sponsored activity; (iii) any conduct involving alcohol, marijuana, a controlled substance, imitation controlled substance, or an anabolic steroid on a school bus, on school property, or at a school-sponsored activity, including the theft or attempted theft of student prescription medications; (iv) any threats against school personnel while on a school bus, on school property or at a school-sponsored activity; (v) the illegal carrying of a firearm, as defined in § 22.1-277.07, onto school property; (vi) any illegal conduct involving firebombs, explosive materials or devices, or hoax explosive devices, as defined in §

18.2-85

, or explosive or incendiary devices, as defined in §

18.2-433.1

, or chemical bombs, as described in §

18.2-87.1

, on a school bus, on school property, or at a school-sponsored activity; (vii) any threats or false threats to bomb, as described in §

18.2-83

, made against school personnel or involving school property or school buses; or (viii) the arrest of any student for an incident occurring on a school bus, on school property, or at a school-sponsored activity, including the charge therefor”; added current subsection B; redesignated accordingly; in current subsection C, deleted “clauses (i) through (viii) of” preceding the first two occurrences of “subsection A”; in current subsection D, substituted “subsection C” for “subsection B”; deleted former subsection D, which read: “Except as may otherwise be required by federal law, regulation, or jurisprudence, the principal shall immediately report to the local law-enforcement agency any act enumerated in clauses (ii) through (vii) of subsection A that may constitute a felony offense and may report to the local law-enforcement agency any incident described in subsection A. Nothing in this section shall require delinquency charges to be filed or prevent schools from dealing with school-based offenses through graduated sanctions or educational programming before a delinquency charge is filed with the juvenile court.

“Further, except as may be prohibited by federal law, regulation, or jurisprudence, the principal shall also immediately report any act enumerated in clauses (ii) through (v) of subsection A that may constitute a criminal offense to the parents of any minor student who is the specific object of such act. Further, the principal shall report whether the incident has been reported to local law enforcement pursuant to this subsection and, if the incident is so reported, that the parents may contact local law enforcement for further information, if they so desire”; and added subsection H.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 26 Tort Actions: Other Common-Law and Statutory Remedies. § 26.16 Defamation. Friend.

§ 22.1-279.3:2.
Public elementary and secondary school students; protective orders; notification.

Any school principal who receives notice that a circuit court, general district court, juvenile and domestic relations district court, or magistrate has issued a protective order pursuant to § 16.1-253, 16.1-253.1, 16.1-253.4, or 16.1-279.1, subsection D of §

18.2-60.3

, or Chapter 9.1 (§

19.2-152.7:1

et seq.) of Title 19.2 for the protection of any child who is enrolled at a public elementary or secondary school in the Commonwealth where such principal is employed, or any other order prohibiting contact with such a child, including an order issued as a condition of pretrial or posttrial supervision, shall subsequently notify licensed instructional personnel and other school personnel who (i) provide direct educational or support services to the protected child or the child subject to the order, (ii) have a legitimate educational interest in such information, and (iii) are responsible for the direct supervision of the protected child or the child subject to the order that such order has been issued.

History.

2019, c. 579.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 579, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education shall establish guidelines and develop model policies to aid local school boards in the implementation of § 22.1-279.3:2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act.”

§ 22.1-279.3:3.
Alternative school discipline process for certain incidents.

A school board may establish an alternative school discipline process to provide the parties involved in an incident of assault or assault and battery, without bodily injury, of any person on a school bus, on school property, or at a school-sponsored activity the option to enter into a mutually agreed-upon process between the involved parties. Such process shall be designed to hold the student accountable for a noncriminal offense through a mutually agreed-upon standard.

If provided for in the process established by the school board, no principal shall report to the local law-enforcement agency a party who successfully completes the alternative school discipline process. If the parties fail to agree to participate in the process or fail to successfully complete the alternative school discipline process, then the principal may report the incident to the local law-enforcement agency.

History.

2020, c. 876; 2022, cc. 793, 794.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 793 and 794 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “of assault or assault and battery, without bodily injury, of any person on a school bus, on school property, or at a school-sponsored activity” for “described in clause (i) of subsection A of § 22.1-279.3:1”; and in subsection B, substituted “to the local law-enforcement agency” for “pursuant to subsection D of § 22.1-279.3:1” in the first sentence and deleted “pursuant to subsection D of § 22.1-279.3:1” in the second sentence at the end.

§ 22.1-279.4.
Information regarding prosecution for certain crimes.

School boards shall provide information developed by the office of the Attorney General to students regarding laws governing the prosecution of juveniles as adults for the commission of certain crimes. Methods of providing such information may include, but shall not be limited to, public announcements in the schools, written notification to parents, publication in the student conduct manual, and inclusion in those materials distributed to parents pursuant to § 22.1-279.3.

History.

1997, c. 465.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles, § 13.

§ 22.1-279.5.
Repealed by Acts 2001, cc. 688 and 820, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-279.5, relating to participation in certain school activities by noncustodial parents, was enacted by Acts 1997, c. 762.

§ 22.1-279.6.
Board of Education guidelines and model policies for codes of student conduct; school board regulations.

The Board of Education shall establish guidelines and develop model policies for codes of student conduct to aid local school boards in the implementation of such policies. The guidelines and model policies shall include (i) criteria for the removal of a student from a class, the use of suspension, expulsion, and exclusion as disciplinary measures, the grounds for suspension and expulsion and exclusion, and the procedures to be followed in such cases, including proceedings for such suspension, expulsion, and exclusion decisions and all applicable appeals processes; (ii) standards, consistent with state, federal and case laws, for school board policies on alcohol and drugs, gang-related activity, hazing, vandalism, trespassing, threats, search and seizure, disciplining of students with disabilities, intentional injury of others, self-defense, bullying, the use of electronic means for purposes of bullying, harassment, and intimidation, and dissemination of such policies to students, their parents, and school personnel; (iii) standards for in-service training of school personnel in and examples of the appropriate management of student conduct and student offenses in violation of school board policies; (iv) standards for dress or grooming codes; and (v) standards for reducing bias and harassment in the enforcement of any code of student conduct.In accordance with the most recent enunciation of constitutional principles by the Supreme Court of the United States of America, the Board’s standards for school board policies on alcohol and drugs and search and seizure shall include guidance for procedures relating to voluntary and mandatory drug testing in schools, including which groups may be tested, use of test results, confidentiality of test information, privacy considerations, consent to the testing, need to know, and release of the test results to the appropriate school authority.In the case of suspension and expulsion, the procedures set forth in this article shall be the minimum procedures that the school board may prescribe.

School boards shall adopt and revise, as required by § 22.1-253.13:7 and in accordance with the requirements of this section, regulations on codes of student conduct that are consistent with, but may be more stringent than, the guidelines of the Board. School boards shall include in the regulations on codes of student conduct procedures for suspension, expulsion, and exclusion decisions and shall biennially review the model student conduct code to incorporate discipline options and alternatives to preserve a safe, nondisruptive environment for effective teaching and learning.

Each school board shall include in its code of student conduct prohibitions against hazing and profane or obscene language or conduct. School boards shall also cite in their codes of student conduct the provisions of §

18.2-56

, which defines and prohibits hazing and imposes a Class 1 misdemeanor penalty for violations, that is, confinement in jail for not more than 12 months and a fine of not more than $2,500, either or both.

Each school board shall include in its code of student conduct policies and procedures that include a prohibition against bullying. Such policies and procedures shall (i) be consistent with the standards for school board policies on bullying and the use of electronic means for purposes of bullying developed by the Board pursuant to subsection A and (ii) direct the principal to notify the parent of any student involved in an alleged incident of bullying of the status of any investigation within five school days of the allegation of bullying.Such policies and procedures shall not be interpreted to infringe upon the First Amendment rights of students and are not intended to prohibit expression of religious, philosophical, or political views, provided that such expression does not cause an actual, material disruption of the work of the school.

A school board may regulate the use or possession of beepers or other portable communications devices and laser pointers by students on school property or attending school functions or activities and establish disciplinary procedures pursuant to this article to which students violating such regulations will be subject.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require any school board to adopt policies requiring or encouraging any drug testing in schools. However, a school board may, in its discretion, require or encourage drug testing in accordance with the Board of Education’s guidelines and model student conduct policies required by subsection A and the Board’s guidelines for student searches required by § 22.1-279.7.

The Board of Education shall establish standards to ensure compliance with the federal Improving America’s Schools Act of 1994 (Part F-Gun-Free Schools Act of 1994), as amended, in accordance with § 22.1-277.07.This subsection shall not be construed to diminish the authority of the Board of Education or to diminish the Governor’s authority to coordinate and provide policy direction on official communications between the Commonwealth and the United States government.

Each school board shall include in its code of student conduct a prohibition on possessing any tobacco product or nicotine vapor product, as those terms are defined in §

18.2-371.2

, on a school bus, on school property, or at an on-site or off-site school-sponsored activity.

Any school board may include in its code of student conduct a dress or grooming code. Any dress or grooming code included in a school board’s code of student conduct or otherwise adopted by a school board shall (i) permit any student to wear any religiously and ethnically specific or significant head covering or hairstyle, including hijabs, yarmulkes, headwraps, braids, locs, and cornrows; (ii) maintain gender neutrality by subjecting any student to the same set of rules and standards regardless of gender; (iii) not have a disparate impact on students of a particular gender; (iv) be clear, specific, and objective in defining terms, if used; (v) prohibit any school board employee from enforcing the dress or grooming code by direct physical contact with a student or a student’s attire; and (vi) prohibit any school board employee from requiring a student to undress in front of any other individual, including the enforcing school board employee, to comply with the dress or grooming code.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-230.1, 22-230.2; 1972, c. 604; 1980, c. 559; 1993, cc. 819, 856, 889; 1995, cc. 724, 801; 1997, cc. 391, 585, 608, 830; 1998, c. 902; 1999, c. 432; 2000, c. 360, §§ 22.1-277.02:1, 22.1-278, 22.1-278.2; 2001, cc. 688, 820; 2003, c. 899; 2004, cc. 574, 908, 939, 955; 2005, cc. 461, 484, 520; 2009, c. 431; 2013, c. 575; 2014, c. 326; 2017, c. 684; 2019, cc. 172, 246; 2020, c. 678.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 899, cl. 2, provides: “That, in order to avoid the costs of printing and mailing, the Board of Education shall issue the revisions to its guidelines and model student conduct policies relating to school board policies on alcohol and drugs and search and seizure pursuant to § 22.1-179.6 [22.1-279.6] and its guidelines for student searches pursuant to § 22.1-179.7 [22.1-279.7] in electronic format only. Such revisions may be transmitted to the division superintendents and the public via any electronic media, including by posting the revisions to the Department of Education’s website.”

Acts 2004, cc. 939 and 955, cl. 2 provides: “That no educational standard set forth in this act, for which state funding is required, shall take effect unless the state’s share of funding that standard is included in the 2004 Appropriation Act, passed during the 2004 Session of the General Assembly and signed by the Governor.” See Editor’s note under § 22.1-253.13:2 and Acts 2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 4, Items 146 B 6 b and 146 C 2 j.

Acts 2014, c. 326, which added subsection H, in cl. 2 provides: “That each school board shall update its policies and code of student conduct to comply with the provisions of this act by July 1, 2015.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 899 inserted the section paragraph of subsection A; inserted the fourth paragraph of subsection B; in subsection C, substituted “as amended”, deleted “to be effective on July 1, 1995”; and in the second paragraph of subsection C, deleted “the Governor concerning decisions on whether, or the extent to which, Virginia shall participate in the federal Improving America’s Schools Act of 1994, or” following “Education or.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 574, in subsection A, substituted “policies for codes of student conduct” for “student conduct policies” and inserted “and model policies” in the second sentence and inserted “hazing” in clause (ii); and in subsection B, in the first paragraph, substituted “on codes of” for “governing” in the first and last sentences and substituted “code” for “standards,” inserted “hazing” and added the last sentence in the second paragraph.

The 2004 amendment by c. 908 inserted “self-defense” in clause (ii) of subsection A.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 939 and 955 are identical, and inserted “as required in § 22.1-253.13:7 and” in the first sentence of subsection B.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 461 and 484 are identical, and inserted “bullying” in clause (ii) of subsection A; and substituted “bullying, hazing, and profane” for “hazing, profane” in the first sentence of the second paragraph in subsection B.

The 2005 amendment by c. 520 inserted “gang-related activity” in clause (ii) of subsection A.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 431 inserted “the use of electronic means for purposes of bullying, harassment, and intimidation” in clause (ii) of the last sentence in the first paragraph of subsection A.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 575 added the subsection C, E and F designators; added subsection D and redesignated former subsection C as G; deleted “bullying” following “prohibition against” and substituted “that is” for “i.e.” in subsection C; substituted “in this section” for “herein” near the beginning of subsection F; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 326 added subsection H.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 684, in subsection D, deleted “by July 1, 2014,” following “code of student conduct” in the first sentence, added clause (ii) in the second sentence, and made related changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 172 and 246 are identical, and in subsection H, substituted “any tobacco product or nicotine vapor product, as those terms are defined in §

18.2-371.2

” for “electronic cigarettes,” substituted “an on-site or off-site school-sponsored activity” for “a school-sponsored activity.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 678, in subsection A, in the first paragraph, deleted “but not be limited to” preceding clause (i) and added clauses (iv) and (v) and deleted “but not limited to” preceding “which groups may be tested” in the second paragraph, added subsection I and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For comment on student rights in Virginia public schools, see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (1988).

For annual survey article on legal issues involving children, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 161 (2003).

For Comment, “Spelling out LGBT: Enumerating Sexual Orientation in Virginia’s Anti-Bullying Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1373 (2013).

§ 22.1-279.7.
Guidelines for student searches.

The Board of Education shall develop, in consultation with the Office of the Attorney General, guidelines for school boards for the conduct of student searches, including random locker searches, voluntary and mandatory drug testing, and strip searches, consistent with relevant state and federal laws and constitutional principles.

School boards shall adopt and revise, in accordance with the requirements of this section, regulations governing student searches that are consistent with the guidelines of the Board.

History.

1998, c. 655; 1999, c. 650; 2000, c. 648, § 22.1-277.01:2; 2001, cc. 688, 820; 2003, c. 899.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 899, cl. 2, provides: “That, in order to avoid the costs of printing and mailing, the Board of Education shall issue the revisions to its guidelines and model student conduct policies relating to school board policies on alcohol and drugs and search and seizure pursuant to § 22.1-179.6 [22.1-279.6] and its guidelines for student searches pursuant to § 22.1-179.7 [22.1-279.7] in electronic format only. Such revisions may be transmitted to the division superintendents and the public via any electronic media, including by posting the revisions to the Department of Education’s website.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 899 in the first paragraph, inserted “voluntary and mandatory drug testing” and in the second paragraph, deleted “Effective for the 2001-2002 school year.”

Law Review.

For annual survey article on legal issues involving children, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 161 (2003).